Massachusetts, session 194th, H4663.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. the Select Board of the Town of Milford may appoint a Highway Surveyor for
a term of up to five (5) years. Notwithstanding sections 108A and 108C of said chapter 41, and
any By-Law adopted under those sections, the Select Board may establish an employment
contract with a Highway Surveyor upon the same terms and conditions, and subject to the same
limitations as contained within section 108N of said Chapter 41, applicable to other municipal
employees as designated in that section.
Section 2. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1